Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-295
Corporal punishment; prohibited.

Corporal punishment shall be prohibited in public schools.

Laws 1988, LB 316, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 99.

Corporal punishment, as prohibited in this section, is reasonably understood to be the infliction of bodily pain as a penalty for disapproved behavior. The use of corporal punishment by a teacher, in violation of this section, may subject the teacher to discipline for unprofessional conduct under section 79-824. Daily v. Board of Ed. of Morrill Cty. School Dist. No. 62-0063, 256 Neb. 73, 588 N.W.2d 813 (1999).